Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-625
Criminal sale of a blank financial transaction device; penalties; blank financial transaction device, defined.

(1) A person commits the offense of criminal sale of a blank financial transaction device if, without the authorization of the issuer or manufacturer, such person has in his or her possession, has under his or her control, or receives from another person a blank financial transaction device, with intent to deliver, circulate, or sell or to cause the delivery, circulation, or sale of such device.

(2) Any person committing the offense of criminal sale of one blank financial transaction device shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

(3) Any person committing the offense of criminal sale of two or more blank financial transaction devices shall be guilty of a Class III felony.

For purposes of section 28-624 and this section, a blank financial transaction device shall mean a device that has at least one or more characteristics of a financial transaction device but does not contain all of the characteristics of a financial transaction device including, but not limited to, a financial transaction device which has not been embossed or magnetically encoded with the name of the account holder, personal identification code, expiration date, or other proprietary institutional information.

Laws 1989, LB 372, § 9.